Missouri, session 2026, HB2248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 393.1640, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 393.1640, to read as follows:
393.1640. 1. Subject to the limitations provided for in subsection 2 of this section,
and upon proper application by an eligible customer prior to public announcement of a
growth project, a new or existing account meeting the criteria in this subsection shall qualify
for one of the discounts set forth in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection:
(1) When the new load is reasonably projected to be at least three hundred kilowatts
but not more than ten megawatts and have a load factor of at least forty-five percent, the
discount shall equal thirty-five percent and shall apply for five years, provided that if it is
expected as of the date the discount is to commence that a thirty-five percent discount would
produce revenues from the applicant's total bill that would not exceed the electrical
corporation's variable cost to serve the applicant's account or accounts that are to receive the
discount, the discount shall be determined so that the percentage discount, rounded to the
nearest one percent, is expected, as of the date the discount percentage is determined, to
provide revenues [equal to one hundred twenty percent of] that exceed the electrical
corporation's variable cost to serve the applicant's account or accounts that are to receive the
discount;
(2) When the new load is reasonably projected to be more than ten megawatts but
less than seventy-five megawatts and have a load factor of at least fifty-five percent, the
discount percentage[, rounded to the nearest one percent, shall be determined such that the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2248 2
applicant's total bill is expected, as of the date the discount percentage is determined, to
provide revenues equal to one hundred twenty percent of the electrical corporation's variable
cost to serve the applicant's account or accounts that are to receive the discount. Such
discount shall apply for ten years] shall equal thirty-five percent and shall apply for five
years, provided that if it is expected as of the date the discount is to commence that a
thirty-five percent discount would produce revenues from the applicant's total bill that
would not exceed the electrical corporation's variable cost to serve the applicant's
account or accounts that are to receive the discount, the discount shall be determined so
that the percentage discount, rounded to the nearest one percent, is expected, as of the
date the discount percentage is determined, to provide revenues that exceed the
electrical corporation's variable cost to serve the applicant's account or accounts that
are to receive the discount.

[For the purposes of this section, the variable cost to serve new load for purposes of
establishing a discount under this section shall be determined using (a) the energy and
capacity market prices that underlie the net base energy costs reflected in the revenue
requirement from the electrical corporation's most recent general rate proceeding; (b) any
operations and maintenance expenses that vary with respect to the total number of customers
or load served by the electrical corporation, excluding operations and maintenance expenses
associated with generating electricity; and (c) any other incremental costs to serve the
customer.]

To obtain one of the discounts set forth in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection, the
customer's load shall be incremental, net of any offsetting load reductions due to the
termination of other accounts of the customer or an affiliate of the customer within twelve
months prior to the commencement of service to the new load, the customer shall receive an
economic development incentive from the local, regional, state, or federal government, or
from an agency or program of any such government, in conjunction with the incremental
load, and the customer shall meet the criteria set forth in the electrical corporation's economic
development rider tariff sheet, as approved by the commission, that are not inconsistent with
the provisions of this subsection. An applicant shall not be eligible for a discount
authorized by this subsection for any new or expanded facility that is determined by an
electrical corporation to be a nonqualifying facility as defined in this section.

Unless otherwise provided for by the electrical corporation's tariff, the applicable discount
shall be a percentage applied to all base-rate components of the bill. The discount shall be
applied to such incremental load from the date when the meter has been permanently set until

HCS HB 2248 3
the date that such incremental load no longer meets the criteria required to qualify for the
discount, as determined under the provisions of subsection 2 of this section. An eligible
customer shall also receive a ten percent discount of all base-rate components of the bill
applied to such incremental load for an additional one-year period beyond the period during
which the applicable discount under subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection applies if the
electrical corporation determines that the customer is taking service from an under-utilized
circuit. The electrical corporation may include in its tariff additional or alternative terms and
conditions to a customer's utilization of the discount, subject to approval of such terms and
conditions by the commission. The customer, on forms supplied by the electrical corporation,
shall apply for the applicable discount provided for by this subsection at least ninety days
prior to the date the customer requests that the incremental demand receive one of the
discounts provided for by this subsection and shall enter into a written agreement with the
electrical corporation reflecting the discount percentages and other pertinent details. If the
incremental demand is not separately metered, the electrical corporation's determination of
the incremental demand shall control. The electrical corporation shall verify the customer's
incremental demand annually to determine continued qualification for the applicable
discount. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection, the cents-per-kilowatt-
hour realization resulting from application of any discounted rates as calculated shall be
higher than the electrical corporation's variable cost to serve such incremental demand and the
applicable discounted rate also shall make a positive contribution to fixed costs associated
with service to such incremental demand. If in a subsequent general rate proceeding the
commission determines that application of a discounted rate is not adequate to cover the
electrical corporation's variable cost to serve the accounts in question and provide a positive
contribution to fixed costs then the commission shall increase the rate for those accounts
prospectively to the extent necessary to do so.
2. In each general rate proceeding concluded after August 28, 2022, the difference in
revenues generated by applying the discounted rates provided for by this section and the
revenues that would have been generated without such discounts shall not be imputed into the
electrical corporation's revenue requirement. Instead, such revenue requirement shall be set
using the revenues generated by such discounted rates and the impact of the discounts
provided for by this section shall be allocated to all the electrical corporation's customer
classes, including the classes with customers that qualify for discounts under this section
through the application of a uniform percentage adjustment to the revenue requirement
responsibility of all customer classes. To qualify for the discounted rates provided for in this
section, customers shall meet the applicable criteria within twenty-four months of initially
receiving discounts based on metering data for calendar months thirteen through twenty-four
and annually thereafter. If such data indicates that the customer did not meet both of the three

HCS HB 2248 4
hundred kilowatt and forty-five percent load factor requirements for any applicable twelve-
month period, it shall thereafter no longer qualify for a discounted rate. For customers
receiving service under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section, if after the fourth year,
the demand has not exceeded ten thousand kilowatts during any twelve-month period, the
customer's qualification shall revert to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section. The
provisions of this section do not supersede or limit the ability of an electrical corporation to
continue to utilize economic development or retention tariffs previously approved by the
100 commission that are in effect on August 28, 2022. If, however, a customer is receiving any
101 economic development or retention-related discounts as of the date it would otherwise qualify
102 for a discount provided for by this section, the customer shall agree to relinquish the prior
103 discount concurrently with the date it begins to receive a discount under this section;
104 otherwise, the customer shall not be eligible to receive any discount under this section.
105 Customer demand existing at the time the customer begins to receive discounted rates under
106 this section shall not constitute incremental demand. The discounted rates provided for by
107 this section apply only to base-rate components, with the charges or credits arising from any
108 rate adjustment mechanism authorized by law to be applied to customers qualifying for
109 discounted rates under this section in the same manner as such rate adjustments would apply
110 in the absence of this section.
111 3. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
112 (1) "Electrical corporation" [shall mean], the same as defined in section 386.020, but
113 shall not include an electrical corporation as described in subsection 2 of section 393.110;
114 (2) "Nonqualifying facility", one or more buildings that are constructed,
115 reconstructed, enlarged, remodeled, or leased to house a group of networked computer
116 servers in this state to centralize the storage, management, and dissemination of data
117 and information pertaining to a particular business, taxonomy, or body of knowledge
118 and such buildings are connected to each other by fiber and associated equipment
119 required for operating a fiber transmission network between the buildings and internet
120 points for the purpose of providing redundancy and resiliency for the services provided
121 in each building.
122 4. An electrical corporation's authority to offer the discounts provided for by this
123 section shall terminate on the date that such electrical corporation's authority to make the
124 deferrals required by subsection 2 of section 393.1400 expires.
✔